Utah statutes.
77-33-7.   Prisoner in another state summoned to testify in this state -- Order of compliance with terms and conditions prescribed by out-of-state judge.

The judge of the court in this state may enter an order directing compliance with the terms and conditions prescribed by the judge of the state in which the witness is confined.

